District of Columbia statutes.
41-110

Property of business associations and banking or financial organizations held in course of dissolution.

All intangible personal property distributable in the course of a voluntary or involuntary dissolution of a business association, banking organization, or financial organization organized under the laws of or created in the District, that is unclaimed by the owner within 60 days after the date of final distribution, is presumed abandoned.

History

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-160, § 110, 27 DCR 5150
Sept. 29, 1992, D.C. Law 9-161, § 2(h), 39 DCR 5696

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 42-210.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 11 of the Uniform Unclaimed Property Act (1981 Act).